Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB155.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 403 of the act of June 13, 1967 (P.L.31, No.21), known as the Human Services Code, is amended by adding a subsection to read:Section 403. Uniformity in Administration of Assistance; Regulations as to Assistance.--* * *(h) On a monthly basis, the department shall check death certificates at the Bureau of Vital Statistics against recipients of medical assistance and benefits from the Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.1234567891011121314151617